Hawaii statutes.
[§659-1] Definition. This is an order
issuing in the name of the State by a circuit court and directed to a person
who claims or usurps an office of the State or of any subdivision thereof, or
of any corporation or quasi-corporation, public or private, or any franchise,
inquiring by what authority the person claims the office or franchise. [L 1876,
c 39, §36; am L 1907, c 39, §1; RL 1925, §2716; RL 1935, §4258; RL 1945,
§10279; RL 1955, §236-19; HRS §659-46; am L 1972, c 90, §3(a); ren HRS §659-1;
gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Will not lie to remove manager of plantation. 5 H. 3 (1883).

Writ to contest fire department election denied where by law
members of a certain board are judges of validity of election. 8 H. 67 (1890).

Pleadings and practice, prior to adoption of Hawaii Rules of
Civil Procedure. 11 H. 22, 29 (1897); 22 H. 385 (1914).

Will lie to oust corporation officers illegally elected and
in office unlawfully. 11 H. 22, 28 (1897); 22 H. 604 (1915); 28 H. 476 (1925);
34 H. 897 (1939).

Writ must issue in the name of the sovereign. 11 H. 22, 29 (1897).

To try title to office. 22 H. 381, 383 (1914); 34 H. 12
(1936); 39 H. 431 (1952); 41 H. 1 (1955).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next